Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.410

Attorney general, prosecuting attorney may institute criminal proceeding—Referral of evidence by director.

(1) The director may refer such evidence as may be available concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order hereunder to the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney, who may in his or her discretion, with or without such a reference, institute the appropriate criminal proceedings under this chapter.

(2) The director may render such assistance as the prosecuting attorney requests regarding a reference.

[ 1998 c 15 s 19; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 29; 1959 c 282 s 41.]